phon-voicing.xfst
! ------------------------------------------------------------
! (de)voicing (kitap - kitabı) and voicing assimilation
! (kitap -> kitapçı, kalem kalemci)
! ------------------------------------------------------------
define intSym @"intermediate-symbols.a";
define boundary ⟪IGB⟫|⟪MB⟫|⟪RB⟫|intSym;
define vowel  @"vowel.a";
define vowelAll  vowel|⟪I⟫|⟪A⟫;
define unvoicedCons  @"cons-unvoiced.a";


regex  ⟪c⟫ -> c,
       ⟪g⟫ -> ğ,
       ⟪p⟫ -> b,
!       ⟪K⟫ (->) ğ,   ! uncomment to allow okumağa as well as okumaya
       ⟪K⟫ -> y,
       ⟪t⟫ -> d ||    _ [boundary - ⟪apos⟫]* vowelAll
    ,, ⟪k⟫ -> ğ || \n _ [boundary - ⟪apos⟫]* vowelAll
    ,, ⟪k⟫ -> g ||  n _ [boundary - ⟪apos⟫]* vowelAll
! replace above three lines if you want voicing assimilation for proper names.
!       ⟪t⟫ -> d ||    _ boundary* vowelAll
!    ,, ⟪k⟫ -> ğ || \n _ boundary* vowelAll
!    ,, ⟪k⟫ -> g ||  n _ boundary* vowelAll
   .o. ⟪c⟫ -> c || _ c
    ,, ⟪g⟫ -> ğ || _ ğ
    ,, ⟪p⟫ -> b || _ b
    ,, ⟪t⟫ -> d || _ d
    ,, ⟪k⟫ -> ğ || _ ğ
    ,, ⟪k⟫ -> g || _ g
   .o. ⟪c⟫ -> ç
    ,, ⟪g⟫ -> g
    ,, ⟪p⟫ -> p
    ,, ⟪K⟫ -> k
    ,, ⟪t⟫ -> t
    ,, ⟪k⟫ -> k
   .o. ⟪C⟫ -> ç,
       ⟪D⟫ -> t,
!       ⟪C⟫ (->) c, !uncomment to allow "relaxed" assimilation
!       ⟪D⟫ (->) t, !uncomment to allow "relaxed" assimilation
       ⟪G⟫ -> k 
       ||   unvoicedCons boundary* _
   .o. ⟪C⟫ -> c
    ,, ⟪D⟫ -> d
    ,, ⟪G⟫ -> g
;
